Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5310YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2150 Section 1. Section 68A.405, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. Published material generated through 3 the use of artificial intelligence and designed to expressly 4 advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate 5 for public office or the passage or defeat of a ballot issue 6 must contain a disclosure on the published material that the 7 published material was generated using artificial intelligence. 8 The disclosure must include the words âthis material was 9 generated using artificial intelligenceâ. 10 b. For purposes of this subsection, âartificial 11 intelligenceâ means a machine-based system that can, for a 12 given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, 13 recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual 14 environments. 15 c. The board shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 68A.507 Endorsements ââ generation by 17 artificial intelligence prohibited. 18 A person shall not publish published material, as defined in 19 section 68A.405, that includes an endorsement of a candidate or 20 ballot measure by a representation of a person that has been 21 generated using artificial intelligence, as defined in section 22 68A.405. 23 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 68B.40 Artificial intelligence 24 limitations. 25 1. For the purposes of this section: 26 a. âArtificial intelligenceâ means the same as defined in 27 section 68A.405. 28 b. âPolitical committeeâ means the same as defined in 29 section 68A.102. 30 c. âState statutory political committeeâ means the same as 31 defined in section 68A.102. 32 2. A candidate, candidateâs committee, political committee, 33 public official, or state statutory political committee shall 34 not use artificial intelligence to depict a candidate or public 35 -1- LSB 5310YH (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2150 official engaging in behavior that the candidate or public 1 official would be unlikely to engage in or that would likely 2 diminish the public perception of the candidate or public 3 official. 4 3. A candidate, that candidateâs committee, or a public 5 official shall not use artificial intelligence to depict the 6 candidate or public official in an event or situation that did 7 not occur. 8 4. A public official shall not use artificial intelligence 9 to manipulate depictions of events of statewide or national 10 importance that a reasonable person would conclude was 11 intended to influence public opinion about a defined group or 12 influence the outcome of an election or the passage or defeat 13 of legislation. 14 5. A candidate, candidateâs committee, political committee, 15 public official, or state statutory political committee shall 16 not knowingly share material generated by a third party using 17 artificial intelligence. A candidate, candidateâs committee, 18 political committee, public official, or state statutory 19 political committee does not violate this subsection if the 20 candidate, candidateâs committee, political committee, public 21 official, or state statutory political committee makes a 22 good-faith effort to remove material that the candidate, 23 candidateâs committee, political committee, public official, 24 or state statutory political committee discovers was generated 25 using artificial intelligence and informs the public that the 26 material was generated using artificial intelligence. 27 6. a. The board may impose a fine of up to five thousand 28 dollars on a candidate or public official for a first violation 29 of this section and a fine of up to one and one-half times the 30 previous fine for each subsequent violation of this section. 31 b. The board may impose a fine of up to fifty thousand 32 dollars on a candidateâs committee, political committee, or 33 state statutory political committee for a first violation of 34 this section and a fine of up to two times the previous fine for 35 -2- LSB 5310YH (3) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2150 each subsequent violation of this section. 1 c. A fine collected by the board pursuant to this subsection 2 shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. 3